ro-RO: Articole sportive > Recreere în aer liber > Plimbări cu barca și sporturi nautice > Plimbări cu barca și rafting: Mănuși pentru plimbări cu barca; Accesorii pentru canoe; Canoe; Accesorii pentru caiace; Caiace; Frânghii și parâme marine; Coarde de siguranță pentru padele; Padele și vâsle; Bărci cu pedale; Bărci cu vâsle; Hărți și diagrame ale căilor navigabile; Plute pentru ape repezi
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Υπαίθριες δραστηριότητες αναψυχής > Ναυσιπλοΐα & θαλάσσια σπορ > Ναυσιπλοΐα & ράφτινγκ: Γάντια ναυσιπλοΐας; Αξεσουάρ κανό; Κανό; Αξεσουάρ καγιάκ; Καγιάκ; Ναυτικά σχοινιά; Λουριά κουπιών; Κουπιά & κουτάλες; Βαρκάκια με πεντάλ; Βαρκάκια με κουπιά; Ναυτικοί χάρτες; Σχεδίες για ορμητικά νερά
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Outdoorové aktivity > Lodě a vodní sporty > Kajaky, kánoe a rafty: Vodácké rukavice; Kánoe – příslušenství; Kánoe; Kajaky – příslušenství; Kajaky; Lodní lana a šňůry; Šňůry na pádla; Pádla a vesla; Šlapadla; Veslice a pramice; Mapy vodních cest; Rafty na divokou vodu
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friluftsliv > Båt og vannsport > Båt og rafting: Båthansker; Kanotilbehør; Kanoer; Kajakktilbehør; Kajakker; Maritimt tauverk og liner; Padlestrenger; Padler og årer; Pedalbåter; Robåter; Sjøkart; Raftflåter
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室外休閒 > 水上運動 > 划船/泛舟: 划船手套; 划艇配件; 划艇; 皮艇配件; 皮艇; 航海繩索; 繫槳繩; 划槳/雙槳; 腳踏船; 划艇/划舟; 水路地圖與海圖; 橡皮艇
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Exteriérové rekreakčné športy > Člnkovanie a vodné športy > Člnkovanie a rafting: Vodácke rukavice; Príslušenstvo pre kanoe; Kanoe; Príslušenstvo pre kajaky; Kajaky; Námorné laná a šnúry; Popruhy na pádla; Pádla a veslá; Šliapacie člny; Veslovacie člny; Mapy a grafy vodných ciest; Rafty na divokú vodu
de: Sportartikel > Outdoor-Aktivitäten > Boot- & Wassersport > Bootssport: Handschuhe für den Bootssport; Kanuzubehör; Kanus; Kajakzubehör; Kajaks; Schiffsseile & -leinen; Paddelriemen; Paddel & Ruder; Tretboote; Ruderboote; Gewässerkarten & Seekarten; Rafts
hu: Sportszerek > Szabadtéri kikapcsolódás > Csónakázás és vízi sportok > Csónakázás és rafting: Csónakázókesztyűk; Kenukiegészítők; Kenuk; Kajakkiegészítők; Kajakok; Tengerészeti kötelek és zsinórok; Evezőpórázok; Lapátok és evezők; Vízibiciklik; Evezős csónakok; Vízi térképek; Vadvízi raftok
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > สันทนาการกลางแจ้ง > กีฬาทางเรือและทางน้ำ > การล่องเรือและแพ: ถุงมือสำหรับพายเรือ; อุปกรณ์แคนู; เรือแคนู; อุปกรณ์คายัค; เรือคายัค; เชือกสำหรับเรือและทางทะเล; เชือกไม้พายเรือ; ไม้พายเรือ; จักรยานน้ำ; เรือพาย; แผนที่และแผนผังเส้นทางน้ำ; เรือยางล่องแก่ง
ja: スポーツ用品 > 屋外レクリエーション > ウォータースポーツ・アクティビティ > カヌー・ラフティング: ボート用グローブ; カヌー関連用品; カヌー; カヤック関連用品; カヤック; マリンロープ・ライン; パドル リーシュ; パドル・オール; ペダルボート; ローボート; 海図・水路マップ; ホワイトウォーターラフト
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Rekreacija na otvorenom > Plovidba i vodeni sportovi > Plovljenje čamcem i rafting: Rukavice za plovidbu; Pribor za kanue; Kanui; Pribor za kajak; Kajaci; Morska užad i konopi; Povodci za vesla; Vesla; Pedaline; Čamci na vesla; Karte i grafikoni plovnih putova; Splavi za divlje vode
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Rekreacja na świeżym powietrzu > Żegluga i sporty wodne > Pływanie łodzią i rafting: Rękawice żeglarskie; Akcesoria do kanadyjek; Kanadyjki; Akcesoria kajakarskie; Kajaki; Liny i cumy żeglarskie; Smycze kajakowe; Wiosła; Rowery wodne; Łodzie wiosłowe; Mapy i schematy dróg wodnych; Pontony do raftingu
sv: Sportartiklar > Utomhusaktiviteter > Båt- och vattensporter > Båtsport: Båthandskar; Kanottillbehör; Kanoter; Kajaktillbehör; Kajaker; Rep och tågvirke för marint bruk; Paddellina; Paddlar och åror; Pedaldrivna båtar; Roddbåtar; Sjökort och farledskartor; Forsränningsflottar
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Poilsis lauke > Plaukiojimas valtimis ir vandens sportas > Plaukimas valtimis ir plaustais: Plaukimo valtimis pirštinės; Kanojų priedai; Kanojos; Baidarių priedai; Baidarės; Jūrų virvės ir linijos; Irklų dirželiai; Irklai; Vandens dviračiai; Irklinės valtys; Vandens kelių žemėlapiai ir diagramos; Plaukimo slenksčiais plaustai
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Açık Hava Etkinlikleri > Kayıkçılık ve Su Sporları > Kayıkçılık ve Rafting: Tekne Eldivenleri; Kano Aksesuarları; Kanolar; Kayık Aksesuarları; Kayaking Kanoları; Denizcilik halatları ve ipleri; Kürek Bağlama İpleri; Kano ve Kayık Kürekleri; Pedallı Tekneler; Kürekli Botlar; Suyolu ve deniz haritaları; Raftlar
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Atividades ao ar livre > Canoagem e esportes aquáticos > Navegação e rafting: Luvas para remo; Acessórios de canoagem; Canoas; Acessórios para caiaques; Caiaques; Cordas e cabos náuticos; Leashes para remo; Pás e remos; Pedalinhos; Barcos a remo; Mapas e cartas náuticas; Botes de rafting
it: Articoli sportivi > Ricreazione outdoor > Sport acquatici > Nautica e rafting: Guanti da canottaggio; Accessori per canoa; Canoe; Accessori per kayak; Kayak; Corde e cime nautiche; Guinzagli per remi; Remi e pagaie; Barche a pedali; Barche da canottaggio; Mappe e carte nautiche; Zattere per acque bianche
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Rekreacija na prostem > Plovba in vodni športi > Plovba in rafting: Rokavice za plovbo; Dodatki za kanuje; Kanuji; Dodatki za kajake; Kajaki; Vrvi za plovila; Vrvi za vesla; Vesla in vesla za čolne; Pedalni čolni; Veslaški čolni; Zemljevidi in navtične karte plovnih poti; Rafti za divje vode
nl: Sportartikelen > Buitenrecreatie > Boten en watersport > Varen en rafting: Boothandschoenen; Accessoires voor kanovaren; Kano's; Accessoires voor kajakken; Kajaks; Maritieme touwen en lijnen; Peddellijnen; Peddels en roeispanen; Waterfietsen; Roeiboten; Vaarkaarten; Boten voor wildwatervaren
fr: Équipements sportifs > Loisirs de plein air > Plaisance et sports nautiques > Plaisance et rafting: Gants de navigation; Accessoires de canoë; Canoës; Accessoires de kayak; Kayaks; Cordages et amarres marines; Leash pour pagaies; Pagaies et rames; Pédalos; Avirons; Cartes et plans de voies navigables; Raftings pour eaux vives
en: Sporting Goods > Outdoor Recreation > Boating & Water Sports > Boating & Rafting: Boating Gloves; Canoe Accessories; Canoes; Kayak Accessories; Kayaks; Marine Ropes & Lines; Paddle Leashes; Paddles & Oars; Pedal Boats; Row Boats; Waterway Maps & Charts; Whitewater Rafts
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Ulkoharrasteet > Veneily ja vesiurheilu > Veneily ja koskenlasku: Veneilyhanskat; Kanoottitarvikkeet; Kanootit; Kajakkitarvikkeet; Kajakit; Veneilyköydet ja -narut; Melanarut; Melat ja airot; Polkuveneet; Soutuveneet; Vesikartat ja merikartat; Koskilautat
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividades recreativas no exterior > Desportos náuticos e aquáticos > Desportos náuticos e rafting: Luvas para desportos náuticos; Acessórios para canoas; Canoas; Acessórios para caiaques; Caiaques; Cordas e cabos marítimos; Fitas para pás; Pás e remos; Barcos a pedais; Barcos a remos; Mapas e cartas de vias navegáveis; Embarcações de rafting
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Giải trí ngoài trời > Chèo thuyền và thể thao dưới nước > Chèo thuyển & thả bè: Găng tay chèo thuyền; Phụ kiện ca-nô; Cano; Phụ kiện thuyền kayak; Kayak; Dây thừng và dây neo hàng hải; Dây buộc mái chèo; Mái chèo; Thuyền đạp nước; Thuyền chèo; Bản đồ và hải đồ đường thủy; Xuồng hơi
ru: Спортивные товары > Активный отдых на открытом воздухе > Гребля и водные виды спорта > Товары для гребли и рафтинга: Перчатки для гребли; Аксессуары для каноэ; Каноэ; Аксессуары для байдарок; Байдарки; Морские канаты и тросы; Страховочные тросы для весел; Весла; Педальные лодки; Гребные лодки; Карты водных путей и лоции; Рафты для сплавов по бурной воде
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 户外休闲 > 划船/水上运动 > 赛艇用品: 划船手套; 皮划艇配件; 独木舟; 皮艇配件; 单人皮划艇; 船用缆绳; 船桨绳; 船桨; 脚踏船; 小划船; 航道地图与海图; 漂流筏
ko: 스포츠용품 > 야외 레크레이션 > 보트 놀이/수상 스포츠 > 보트/래프트: 보트 장갑; 카누 부대용품; 카누; 카약 부대용품; 카약; 해양 로프 및 라인; 패들 리쉬; 패들/노; 페달 보트; 로 보트; 수로 지도 및 해도; 급류래프팅 보트
da: Sportsartikler > Friluftsliv > Sejling og vandsport > Sejlads og rafting: Sejlhandsker; Kanosejlads – tilbehør; Kanoer; Kajakroning – tilbehør; Kajakker; Tovværk og liner til både; Padel- og pagajremme; Padler og årer; Pedalbåde; Robåde; Søkort og vandvejskort; Raftingbåde
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Actividades al aire libre > Deportes acuáticos y navegación deportiva > Navegación y rafting: Guantes para navegación deportiva; Accesorios para canoas; Canoas; Accesorios para kayak; Kayaks; Cuerdas y cabos marinos; Correas para palas; Palas y remos; Barcas a pedales; Botes de remo; Mapas y cartas de navegación por vías fluviales; Balsas para el descenso de rápidos
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания на открито > Плаване с лодка и водни спортове > Плаване с лодка и рафтинг: Ръкавици за лодка; Аксесоари за кану; Канута; Аксесоари за каяк; Каяци; Морски въжета и линии; Каишки за гребла; Весла и гребла; Водни колела; Гребни лодки; Карти и диаграми на водните пътища; Рафтинг лодки за бърза вода